Florida, session 2026, SB1032.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 18 19 Section 1.âParagraphs (f) and (g) of subsection (4) and 20 paragraphs (a) and (d) of subsection (7) of section 381.986, 21 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 22 381.986âMedical use of marijuana.â 23 (4)âPHYSICIAN CERTIFICATION.â 24 (f)âA qualified physician may not issue a physician 25 certification for more than ten three 70-day supply limits of 26 marijuana or more than twenty six 35-day supply limits of 27 marijuana in a form for smoking. The department shall quantify 28 by rule a daily dose amount with equivalent dose amounts for 29 each allowable form of marijuana dispensed by a medical 30 marijuana treatment center. The department shall use the daily 31 dose amount to calculate a 70-day supply. 32 1.âA qualified physician may request an exception to the 33 daily dose amount limit, the 35-day supply limit of marijuana in 34 a form for smoking, and the 4-ounce possession limit of 35 marijuana in a form for smoking established in paragraph 36 (14)(a). The request must shall be made electronically on a form 37 adopted by the department in rule and must include, at a 38 minimum: 39 a.âThe qualified patientâs qualifying medical condition. 40 b.âThe dosage and route of administration that was 41 insufficient to provide relief to the qualified patient. 42 c.âA description of how the patient will benefit from an 43 increased amount. 44 d.âThe minimum daily dose amount of marijuana that would be 45 sufficient for the treatment of the qualified patientâs 46 qualifying medical condition. 47 2.âA qualified physician must provide the qualified 48 patientâs records upon the request of the department. 49 3.âThe department shall approve or disapprove the request 50 within 14 days after receipt of the complete documentation 51 required by this paragraph. The request is shall be deemed 52 approved if the department fails to act within this time period. 53 (g)âA qualified physician must evaluate an existing 54 qualified patient at least once every 104 30 weeks before 55 issuing a new physician certification. A qualified physician who 56 has issued a certification to the patient after conducting an 57 in-person physical examination as defined in subparagraph (a)1. 58 may conduct the evaluation through telehealth as defined in s. 59 456.47. A physician must: 60 1.âDetermine whether if the patient still meets the 61 requirements to be issued a physician certification under 62 paragraph (a). 63 2.âIdentify and document in the qualified patientâs medical 64 records whether the qualified patient experienced either of the 65 following related to the medical use of marijuana: 66 a.âAn adverse drug interaction with any prescription or 67 nonprescription medication; or 68 b.âA reduction in the use of, or dependence on, other types 69 of controlled substances as defined in s. 893.02. 70 3.âSubmit a report with the findings required pursuant to 71 subparagraph 2. to the department. The department shall submit 72 such reports to the Consortium for Medical Marijuana Clinical 73 Outcomes Research established pursuant to s. 1004.4351. 74 (7)âIDENTIFICATION CARDS.â 75 (a)âThe department shall issue medical marijuana use 76 registry identification cards for qualified patients and 77 caregivers who are residents of this state, which must be 78 renewed biennially annually. The identification cards must be 79 resistant to counterfeiting and tampering and must include, at a 80 minimum, the following: 81 1.âThe name, address, and date of birth of the qualified 82 patient or caregiver. 83 2.âA full-face, passport-type, color photograph of the 84 qualified patient or caregiver taken within the 90 days 85 immediately preceding registration or the Florida driver license 86 or Florida identification card photograph of the qualified 87 patient or caregiver obtained directly from the Department of 88 Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles. 89 3.âIdentification as a qualified patient or a caregiver. 90 4.âThe unique numeric identifier used for the qualified 91 patient in the medical marijuana use registry. 92 5.âFor a caregiver, the name and unique numeric identifier 93 of the caregiver and the qualified patient or patients that the 94 caregiver is assisting. 95 6.âThe expiration date of the identification card. 96 (d)âApplications for identification cards must be submitted 97 on a form prescribed by the department. The department may 98 charge a reasonable fee associated with the issuance, 99 replacement, and renewal of identification cards. However, the 100 department shall waive all such fees for any veteran who was 101 honorably discharged from the United States Armed Forces. The 102 department shall allocate $10 of the identification card fee to 103 the Division of Research at Florida Agricultural and Mechanical 104 University for the purpose of educating minorities about 105 marijuana for medical use and the impact of the unlawful use of 106 marijuana on minority communities. The department shall contract 107 with a third-party vendor to issue identification cards. The 108 vendor selected by the department must have experience 109 performing similar functions for other state agencies. 110 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.